Nevada, session 83, SB398.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 687B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 24, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in NRS 687B.225 and sections 2 to 24,
inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in sections 3 to 12, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Adverse determination” means a determination by a
health carrier that an admission, availability of care, continued
stay or other medical care or dental care that is a covered benefit
has been reviewed and, based upon the information provided, does
not meet the health carrier’s requirements for medical necessity,
appropriateness, health care setting, level of care or effectiveness,
and the requested care or service or payment for the care or
service is therefore denied, reduced or terminated.
Sec. 4. “Coverage period” means the current term of a
contract or policy of insurance issued by a health carrier.
Sec. 5. “Emergency services” means health care services
that are provided by a provider of health care to screen and to
stabilize an insured after the sudden onset of a medical condition
that manifests itself by symptoms of such sufficient severity that a
-
*SB398*

– 5 –
prudent person would believe that the absence of immediate
medical attention could result in:
1. Serious jeopardy to the health of the insured;
2. Serious jeopardy to the health of an unborn child of the
insured;
3. Serious impairment of a bodily function of the insured; or
4. Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part of the
insured.
Sec. 6. “Health carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.024, and includes, without limitation, an organization
for dental care. The term additionally includes a utilization review
organization, as defined in NRS 695G.085.
Sec. 7. “Individually identifiable health information” means
information relating to the provision of medical or dental care to
an insured:
1. That specifically identifies the insured; or
2. For which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the
information can be used to identify the insured.
Sec. 8. “Insured” means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee
or other person covered by a health carrier.
Sec. 9. “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 695G.055.
Sec. 10. “Network” means a defined set of providers of
health care who are under contract with a health carrier to
provide health care services pursuant to a network plan offered or
issued by the health carrier.
Sec. 11. “Network plan” means a contract or policy of
insurance offered by a health carrier under which the financing
and delivery of medical or dental care is provided, in whole or in
part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
health carrier.
Sec. 12. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695G.070.
Sec. 13. 1. A health carrier shall not make an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization unless:
(a) The adverse determination is made by a physician or, for
dental care, a dentist, who:
(1) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine or
dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of the United
States;
(2) Is of the same or similar specialty as a physician or
dentist, as applicable, who typically manages or treats the medical
or dental condition or provides the medical or dental care involved
in the request; and
-
*SB398*

– 6 –
(3) Has experience treating or managing the medical or
dental condition involved in the request; and
(b) The adverse determination is made under the clinical
direction or supervision of a medical director employed by the
health carrier who is a physician who is licensed to practice
medicine in any state or territory of the United States.
2. If a physician or dentist described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 is considering making an adverse determination on a
request for prior authorization on the basis that the medical or
dental care involved in the request is not medically necessary, the
health carrier that received the request shall:
(a) Immediately notify the provider of health care who
submitted the request that the medical necessity of the requested
care is being questioned by the health carrier; and
(b) Offer the provider of health care an opportunity to speak
with the physician or dentist, as applicable, over the telephone or
by videoconference to discuss the clinical issues involved in the
request before the physician or dentist renders an initial
determination on the request.
3. Upon rendering an adverse determination on a request for
prior authorization, a health carrier shall immediately transmit to
the insured to whom the request pertains a written notice that
contains:
(a) A specific description of all reasons that the health carrier
made the adverse determination;
(b) A description of any documentation that the health carrier
requested from the insured or a provider of health care of the
insured and did not receive or deemed insufficient, if the failure to
receive sufficient documentation contributed to the adverse
determination;
(c) A statement that the insured has the right to appeal the
adverse determination;
(d) Instructions, written in clear language that is
understandable to an ordinary layperson, describing how the
insured can appeal the adverse determination through the process
established pursuant to subsection 4; and
(e) A description of any documentation that may be necessary
or pertinent to a potential appeal.
4. A health carrier shall establish a process that allows an
insured to appeal an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization. The process must allow for the clear resolution of
each appeal within a reasonable time.
5. A health carrier shall not uphold on appeal an adverse
determination pertaining to a request for prior authorization
-
*SB398*

– 7 –
unless the decision on the appeal is made by a physician or, for
dental care, a dentist, who:
(a) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine or
dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of the United
States;
(b) Is actively practicing medicine or dentistry, as applicable,
within the same or similar specialty as a physician or dentist, as
applicable, who typically manages or treats the medical or dental
condition or provides the medical or dental care involved in the
request and has been actively practicing in that specialty for at
least 5 consecutive years preceding the date on which the
physician or dentist, as applicable, makes the determination on the
appeal;
(c) Is knowledgeable of and has experience treating or
managing the medical or dental condition involved in the request;
(d) Was not involved in making the adverse determination that
is the subject of the appeal;
(e) Has no financial interest in the outcome of the request for
prior authorization that is the subject of the appeal;
(f) Is not employed by or contracted with the health carrier
except:
(1) To participate in the network of the health carrier in his
or her capacity as a practicing physician or dentist, as applicable;
(2) To make determinations on reviews or appeals of
adverse determinations; or
(3) For the purposes described in both subparagraphs (1)
and (2); and
(g) Considers all known clinical aspects of the medical or
dental care involved in the request, including, without limitation:
(1) The medical records of the insured that are provided or
accessible to the health carrier, including those records provided
to the health carrier by the insured or a provider of health care of
the insured;
(2) The clinical review criteria adopted by the health carrier
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 687B.225; and
(3) Medical or scientific evidence provided to the health
carrier by the provider of health care who requested prior
authorization for the care at issue.
6. As used in this section, “medical or scientific evidence”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 695G.053.
Sec. 14. 1. If a health carrier approves a request for prior
authorization, the benefit to which the approval pertains shall be
deemed a covered benefit for the remainder of the applicable
coverage period, regardless of any subsequent changes to the
-
*SB398*

– 8 –
coverage provided by the applicable contract or policy of health
insurance.
2. If an insured for whom a request for prior authorization
has been approved by a health carrier obtains coverage under a
different policy or contract of health insurance issued by the same
health carrier, the health carrier shall honor the approval to the
same extent as if the insured were still covered under the policy or
contract of health insurance under which the insured was covered
when the health carrier approved the request.
3. If a health carrier approves a request for prior
authorization that relates to a chronic or long-term condition that
is specifically identified in the request, the approval remains valid
for the entire length of the treatment, subject to the provisions of
section 15 of this act. A health carrier shall not require an insured
who receives an approval pursuant to this subsection to obtain
additional prior authorization for the same care so long as the
insured is covered by any policy or contract of insurance issued by
the health carrier.
4. Within the first 90 days after the coverage period for an
insured begins, a health carrier shall honor a request for prior
authorization that has been approved by a health carrier or other
entity that previously provided the insured with coverage for
medical or dental care if:
(a) The approval was issued within the 12 months immediately
preceding the first day of the coverage period under the current
contract or policy of insurance; and
(b) The specific medical or dental care included within the
request is not affirmatively excluded under the terms and
conditions of the contract or policy of insurance issued by the
health carrier.
5. A health carrier may undertake an independent review of
the care approved by the previous health carrier of an insured
which is subject to the requirements of subsection 4, for the
purpose of granting its own approval of the care. A health carrier
may not deny approval in violation of subsection 4 as the result of
such a review.
Sec. 15. 1. A health carrier may revoke, limit, condition or
restrict an approval granted for a request for prior authorization
only if:
(a) The care to which the request pertains was not provided
within 45 business days after the health carrier received the
request;
(b) The health carrier determines that any of the conditions
under which the health carrier may refuse to pay a claim pursuant
to subsection 4, 5, 6 or 7 of section 16 of this act exist; or
-
*SB398*

– 9 –
(c) The health carrier:
(1) Determines that the insured was not covered by a policy
or contract of insurance issued by the health carrier on the date
on which the approved care was provided; and
(2) Has satisfied the conditions of subsection 2.
2. A health carrier may revoke, limit, condition or restrict an
approval granted for a request for prior authorization pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 only if, before the care to which the
request pertains was provided, the health carrier provided to the
provider of health care who provided the care a mechanism by
which the provider of health care could confirm whether the
insured is:
(a) Covered by the health carrier; and
(b) Eligible to receive coverage for the care on the date on
which the care is scheduled to be provided, including, without
limitation, the length of any approved inpatient stay in a medical
facility.
3. As used in this section, “medical facility” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 449.0151.
Sec. 16. A health carrier that has approved a request for
prior authorization shall not refuse to pay a claim for the medical
or dental care approved by the health carrier or refuse to pay a
provider of health care who participates in the network of the
health carrier at the applicable contracted rate for the approved
care unless:
1. The approval is later revoked, limited, conditioned or
restricted pursuant to section 15 of this act in a manner that
precludes payment of the claim.
2. The medical or dental care at issue was never performed.
3. The claim for the medical or dental care was not timely
submitted in accordance with the applicable terms and conditions
of the policy or contract of insurance issued by the health carrier.
4. The medical or dental care at issue was not a covered
benefit on the date on which the care was provided.
5. The health carrier possesses specific evidence available for
review by the Commissioner or by law enforcement that the
insured to whom the approval pertains or the provider of health
care of the insured made a material or fraudulent representation
to obtain the approval or fraudulently obtained the approval by
other means.
6. The insured exhausted the applicable coverage or benefit
under the terms and conditions of the policy or contract of
insurance after the health carrier approved the care but before the
claim for the care was processed by the health carrier. A health
carrier may refuse to provide coverage or pay a claim on these
-
*SB398*

– 10 –
grounds only if the health carrier disclosed to the insured at the
time that the health carrier approved the request for the care that
the care authorized might exceed the coverage or benefits provided
under the policy or contract, and would accordingly not be
covered.
7. The provider of health care was not participating in the
network of the health carrier on the date on which the care was
provided.
Sec. 17. 1. A health carrier shall not require prior
authorization for emergency services covered by the health
carrier, including, where applicable, transportation by ambulance
to a hospital or other medical facility.
2. If a health carrier requires an insured or his or her
provider of health care to notify the health carrier that the insured
has been admitted to a hospital to receive emergency services or
has received emergency services, the health carrier shall not
require an insured or a provider of health care to transmit such a
notice earlier than the end of the business day immediately
following the day on which the insured was admitted or the
emergency services were provided, as applicable.
3. A health carrier shall not deny coverage for emergency
services covered by the health carrier that are medically necessary.
Emergency services are presumed to be medically necessary if,
within 72 hours after an insured is admitted to receive emergency
services, the provider of health care of the insured transmits to the
health carrier a certification, in writing, that the condition of the
insured required emergency services. The health carrier may rebut
that presumption by establishing, by clear and convincing
evidence, that the emergency services were not medically
necessary.
4. If an insured receives emergency services and must
additionally receive post-evaluation or post-stabilization medical
care, and a health carrier requires prior authorization for the
post-evaluation or post-stabilization medical care, the health
carrier shall approve or make an adverse determination on a
request for prior authorization for such care within 60 minutes
after receiving the request.
5. A health carrier shall make all determinations for whether
emergency services are medically necessary without regard to
whether a provider of health care that provided or billed for those
services participates in the network of the health carrier.
6. A health carrier shall not impose a restriction or limitation
on coverage of emergency services provided by a provider of
health care who does not participate in the network of the health
carrier that is greater than any restriction or limitation imposed on
-
*SB398*

– 11 –
coverage for emergency services that are provided by a provider of
health care who participates in the network of the health carrier.
Sec. 18. 1. A health carrier shall not require prior
authorization for a surgical procedure or other invasive procedure
that is related or incidental to, and performed during the course
of, a different procedure for which the health carrier:
(a) Has granted prior authorization; or
(b) Does not require prior authorization.
2. A health carrier shall not deny a request for prior
authorization for a covered prescription drug that is prescribed for
the purpose of treating or managing pain if the insured to whom
the request pertains is diagnosed with a terminal condition and the
diagnosis of the condition is indicated on the request for prior
authorization.
3. A health carrier shall act on a request for prior
authorization relating to a course of treatment for a mental,
emotional, behavioral or substance use disorder or condition in a
manner that is consistent with the manner that the health carrier
would act on a request for prior authorization relating to a course
of treatment for any other type of disease or condition. A health
carrier shall additionally treat an appeal of an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization relating to a
course of treatment for a mental, emotional, behavioral or
substance use disorder or condition in the same manner as it
would act on any other appeal of an adverse determination.
4. As used in this section, “terminal condition” means an
incurable and irreversible condition that, without the
administration of life-sustaining treatment, will, in the opinion of
the attending physician, physician assistant or attending advanced
practice registered nurse, result in death within a relatively short
time.
Sec. 19. 1. A health carrier shall exempt a provider of
health care who participates in the network of the health carrier
from the requirement to obtain prior authorization for a specific
good or service if, within the immediately preceding 12 months,
the health carrier approved 80 percent or more of the requests for
prior authorization for that specific good or service submitted by
the provider of health care. If a provider of health care qualifies
for an exemption pursuant to this section, a health carrier shall:
(a) Automatically grant the exemption without requiring the
provider of health care to submit a request for the exemption; and
(b) Transmit to the provider of health care after granting the
exemption a notice that includes:
(1) A statement that the provider of health care has been
granted an exemption from the requirement to obtain prior
-
*SB398*

– 12 –
authorization from the health carrier for the specific goods and
services listed pursuant to subparagraph (2);
(2) A list of goods and services to which the exemption
applies; and
(3) The date on which the exemption expires, which must
not be earlier than 12 months after the date on which the health
carrier granted the exemption.
2. A health carrier shall provide for an annual review of the
requests for prior authorization submitted by providers of health
care who participate in the network of the health carrier to
determine whether those providers meet the criteria prescribed by
subsection 1 for an exemption from the requirement to obtain
prior authorization. If a provider of health care is initially
determined to be ineligible for an exemption based on such a
review, the eligibility of the provider of health care to receive an
exemption must be independently determined by a provider of
health care who:
(a) Is licensed in this State;
(b) Is of the same or similar specialty as the provider of health
care who is being evaluated for an exemption; and
(c) Has experience providing the good or service for which the
exemption has been initially denied.
3. A provider of health care who is not granted an exemption
from the requirement to obtain prior authorization for a particular
good or service may, for that specific good or service, request from
the health carrier any evidence that supported the decision of the
health carrier to not grant the exemption for that good or service.
A provider of health care may submit a request for supporting
evidence pursuant to this subsection not more than once during a
single 12-month period for each good or service for which the
provider of health care has not been granted an exemption.
4. An exemption from the requirement to obtain prior
authorization pursuant to this section applies to the provision of
any good or service covered by the exemption which is provided or
ordered by the provider of health care to whom the exception
applies.
5. A health carrier shall not deny a claim or reduce the
amount of payment paid under a claim for a good or service that is
subject to an exemption pursuant to this section unless:
(a) The provider of health care who submitted the claim
knowingly and materially misrepresented the goods or services
actually provided to an insured, and the provider of health care
made the misrepresentation with the specific intent to obtain a
payment from the health carrier to which the provider of health
care is not legally or contractually entitled; or
-
*SB398*

– 13 –
(b) The service or good for which payment is sought was not
substantially performed or provided, as applicable.
Sec. 20. 1. Not more than once during a single 12-month
period, a health carrier may reevaluate the eligibility of a provider
of health care to receive an exemption from the requirement to
obtain prior authorization pursuant to section 19 of this act.
2. A health carrier may revoke an exemption from the
requirement to obtain prior authorization granted to a provider of
health care pursuant to subsection 1 only if the health carrier
determines that the provider of health care would not have met the
criteria prescribed in subsection 1 of section 19 of this act for the
good or service to which the exemption applies based on:
(a) A retrospective review of claims submitted by the provider
of health care for that good or service during the immediately
preceding 3 months; or
(b) If the provider of health care did not submit at least 10
claims for that good or service during the immediately preceding 3
months, a retrospective review of at least the last 10 claims
submitted by the provider of health care for that good or service.
3. If it is initially determined that a provider of health care
meets the criteria prescribed in subsection 2 for the revocation of
an exemption based on a review conducted pursuant to that
subsection, the satisfaction of those criteria must be independently
determined by a provider of health care described in subsection 2
of section 19 of this act before the health carrier may revoke the
exemption.
4. A health carrier that revokes an exemption from the
requirement to obtain prior authorization pursuant to subsection 2
shall transmit to the provider of health care to which the
revocation pertains a notice that includes:
(a) The information that the health carrier relied upon when
making the determination described in subsection 2;
(b) An identification of each good or service to which the
revoked exemption applies;
(c) The date on which the revocation takes effect, which must
not be earlier than 30 days after the date on which the health
carrier transmits the notice; and
(d) A description, written in easily comprehensible language,
of how the provider of health care may appeal the revocation
pursuant to subsection 5.
5. A health carrier shall adopt a procedure by which a
provider of health care may appeal the revocation of an exemption
from the requirement to obtain prior authorization. If a provider
of health care appeals a revocation of such exemption, the
exemption must remain in effect:
-
*SB398*

– 14 –
(a) If the revocation is reversed on appeal, until the next
reevaluation pursuant to subsection 1 of the eligibility of the
provider of health care to continue receiving the exemption.
(b) If the revocation is upheld on appeal, until the later of the
5th calendar day after the revocation is upheld or the date
contained within the notice sent to the provider of health care
pursuant to subsection 4.
Sec. 21. 1. If a health carrier violates NRS 687B.225 or
sections 13 to 18, inclusive, of this act with respect to a particular
request for prior authorization, the request shall be deemed
approved.
2. Any provision of a policy or contract issued by a health
carrier or any other contract or agreement that conflicts with this
section, NRS 687B.225 or sections 13 to 20, inclusive, of this act is
against public policy, void and unenforceable.
Sec. 22. A health carrier that requires prior authorization for
prescription drugs shall accept and respond to any request for
prior authorization for a prescription drug through a secure
electronic transmission using the National Council for
Prescription Drug Programs SCRIPT standard described in 42
C.F.R. § 423.160(b).
Sec. 23. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, a
health carrier shall publish on an Internet website maintained by
the health carrier in an easily accessible format the following
information for the immediately preceding calendar year, in
aggregated form for all requests for prior authorization received
by the insurer during the immediately preceding year and
disaggregated in accordance with subsection 2:
(a) The percentage of requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care in this State that were approved upon initial
review;
(b) The percentage of requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care in this State that resulted in an adverse
determination upon initial review;
(c) The percentage of the adverse determinations described in
paragraph (b) that were appealed;
(d) The percentage of appeals of adverse determinations
described in paragraph (c) that resulted in a reversal of the
adverse determination; and
(e) The average time between a request for prior authorization
for medical or dental care in this State and the resolution of the
request.
2. The information described in subsection 1 must be
disaggregated for the following categories:
-
*SB398*

– 15 –
(a) The specialty of the provider of health care who submitted
a request for prior authorization; and
(b) The types of medical or dental care at issue in the request
for prior authorization, including the specific types of prescription
drugs, procedures or diagnostic tests involved in the requests.
3. A health carrier shall not include individually identifiable
health information in the information published pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 24. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, a
health carrier shall compile and transmit to the Commissioner, in
a form prescribed by the Commissioner, and publish on an
Internet website maintained by the health carrier a report
containing the following information:
(a) The specific goods and services for which the health
carrier requires prior authorization and, for each good or service:
(1) The number of requests for prior authorization received
by the health carrier during the immediately preceding calendar
year for the provision of the good or service to insureds in this
State;
(2) The average and median amount of time, in hours,
between the health carrier receiving a request for prior
authorization listed pursuant to subparagraph (1), except those
requests for which the health carrier required additional
information to process the request, and the health carrier
approving or making an adverse determination on the request;
(3) The number and percentage of requests for prior
authorization listed pursuant to subparagraph (1) that were not
included in calculating the times described in subparagraph (2);
(4) The number and percentage of the requests listed
pursuant to subparagraph (1) that were approved;
(5) The number and percentage of the requests listed
pursuant to subparagraph (1) that resulted in adverse
determinations;
(6) The number of appeals from adverse determinations
listed pursuant to subparagraph (5) during the immediately
preceding calendar year and the number and percentage of those
adverse determinations that were reversed on appeal by the health
carrier;
(7) The number of appeals described in subparagraph (6)
processed at each level of the appeals process established by the
health carrier, as applicable;
(8) The number and percentage of requests listed pursuant
to subparagraphs (4) and (5) that were processed by the health
carrier with the assistance of artificial intelligence, machine-
learning technology or other similar technologies that are
-
*SB398*

– 16 –
independently capable of generating recommendations for or
decisions on requests for prior authorization;
(9) The number of civil actions brought against the health
carrier which challenged an adverse determination described in
subparagraph (5); and
(10) The numbers and percentages of civil actions
described in subparagraph (9) that, through verdict or settlement,
resulted in the adverse determination being reversed or the health
carrier paying money to the insured;
(b) The information required pursuant to subparagraphs (1) to
(10), inclusive, of paragraph (a) aggregated for all requests for
prior authorization received by the health carrier for insureds in
this State during the immediately preceding year;
(c) The number of grievances received by the health carrier
from insureds in this State in the immediately preceding calendar
year relating to requests for prior authorization or the
requirements established by the health carrier for prior
authorization;
(d) A description of the type and nature of any technology
described in subparagraph (8) of paragraph (a) used by the health
carrier, if applicable, to process requests for prior authorization
for insureds in this State;
(e) A list of each surgical procedure for which the health
carrier required prior authorization during the immediately
preceding calendar year where, in the course of the surgical
procedure, the provider of health care performing the procedure
determined that an additional or substitute item or service was
medically necessary and, for each such surgical procedure, the
number of times during the immediately preceding calendar year
that:
(1) The surgical procedure was performed on an insured;
(2) The provider of health care performing the surgical
procedure determined that an additional or substitute item or
service was medically necessary;
(3) The health carrier agreed to cover the additional or
substitute item or service; and
(4) The health carrier made an adverse determination
concerning coverage for the additional or substitute item or
service; and
(f) Such additional information as the Commissioner may
prescribe by regulation.
2. On or before May 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Commissioner shall:
(a) Compile a report:
-
*SB398*

– 17 –
(1) Summarizing the information submitted to the
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 during the immediately
preceding biennium;
(2) Listing the specific goods and services for which health
carriers approved requests for prior authorization for insureds in
this State at a combined rate of 80 percent or more during the
immediately preceding biennium; and
(3) Recommending legislation to prohibit health carriers
from requiring prior authorization for the specific goods and
services listed pursuant to subparagraph (2); and
(b) Submit the report and all information provided to the
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services and the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Commerce and Labor.
3. A health carrier shall not include individually identifiable
health information in a report published pursuant to this section.
Sec. 25. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177, and sections 17, 18 and 19 of this act,
any contract [for group, blanket or individual health] or policy of
insurance [or any contract by a nonprofit hospital, medical or dental
service corporation or organization for dental care] issued by a
health carrier which provides for payment of a certain part of
medical or dental care may require the insured [or member] to
obtain prior authorization for that care from the [insurer or
organization. The insurer or organization] health carrier in a
manner consistent with this section and sections 2 to 24, inclusive,
of this act.
2. A health carrier that requires an insured to obtain prior
authorization shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining [approval of care] prior
authorization pursuant to this section , including, without
limitation, a list of the specific goods and services for which the
health carrier requires prior authorization and the clinical review
-
*SB398*

– 18 –
criteria used by the health carrier to evaluate requests for prior
authorization, for approval by the Commissioner . [; and]
(b) When determining whether to approve or make an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization, determine
whether the purported insured is:
(1) Currently covered by a contract or policy of health
insurance issued by the health carrier; and
(2) Eligible to receive coverage for the goods or services to
which the request pertains.
(c) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
[respond to] and except as otherwise provided by paragraph (d),
approve or make an adverse determination on any request for
[approval by the insured or member] prior authorization submitted
by or on behalf of the insured pursuant to this section [within 20
days after it receives the request.
2.] and notify the insured and his or her provider of health
care of the approval or adverse determination:
(1) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 48 hours
after receiving the request.
(2) For urgent health care, within 24 hours after receiving
the request.
(d) If the health carrier requires additional, medically relevant
information or documentation, including, without limitation, an
in-person evaluation of the insured or a second opinion from a
different provider of health care, in order to adequately evaluate a
request for prior authorization:
(1) Notify the insured and the provider of health care who
submitted the request within the applicable amount of time
described in paragraph (c) that additional information is required
to evaluate the request;
(2) Include within the notification sent pursuant to
subparagraph (1) a description, with reasonable specificity, of the
information that the health carrier requires to make a
determination on the request for prior authorization; and
(3) Approve or make an adverse determination on the
request:
(I) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 48
hours after receiving the information.
(II) For urgent health care, within 24 hours after
receiving the information.
3. The procedure for prior authorization may not discriminate
among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
-
*SB398*

– 19 –
4. If a health carrier seeks to amend its procedure for
obtaining prior authorization, including, without limitation,
changing the goods and services for which the health carrier
requires prior authorization or changing the clinical review
criteria used by the health carrier, the health carrier:
(a) Must file a request to amend the procedure for approval by
the Commissioner.
(b) May not allow the amended procedure to take effect until:
(1) The Commissioner notifies the health carrier that the
request is approved; and
(2) The requirements of subsection 5 are satisfied.
5. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 8, a change to
a health carrier’s procedure for obtaining prior authorization may
not take effect until:
(a) The health carrier transmits a notice that contains a
summary of the changes to the procedure to each of its insureds
and providers of health care who participate in the network of the
health carrier;
(b) The health carrier updates the information published on its
Internet website pursuant to subsection 6 to reflect the amended
procedure for obtaining prior authorization and the date on which
the amended procedure takes effect; and
(c) At least 60 days have passed after the later of:
(1) The date on which the health carrier transmitted the
notice to its insureds and providers of health care who participate
in the network of the health carrier pursuant to paragraph (a); or
(2) The date on which the health carrier updated the
information published on its Internet website pursuant to
paragraph (b).
6. A health carrier shall publish its procedures for obtaining
prior authorization, including, without limitation, the clinical
review criteria, on its Internet website:
(a) Using clear language that is understandable to an ordinary
layperson, where practicable; and
(b) In a place that is readily accessible and conspicuous to
insureds and the public.
7. A health carrier shall not deny a claim based on the failure
of an insured to obtain prior authorization for medical or dental
care if the procedure for obtaining prior authorization established
by the health carrier did not require the insured to obtain prior
authorization for that medical or dental care on the date on which
the medical or dental care was provided to the insured.
8. A change in the health carrier’s procedure for obtaining
prior authorization or a new exclusion or limitation of coverage
-
*SB398*

– 20 –
adopted by a health carrier may not take effect until the next
coverage period with respect to:
(a) An insured for whom the health carrier has, within the
current coverage period, approved a request for prior
authorization; and
(b) The medical or dental care that is identical to the care for
which the health carrier had previously approved a request for
prior authorization within the current coverage period.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Clinical review criteria” means any written screening
procedure, formulary decision abstract, clinical protocol, practice
guideline or other criteria used by the health carrier to determine
the necessity and appropriateness of medical or dental care.
(b) “Urgent health care”:
(1) Means health care that, in the opinion of a provider of
health care with knowledge of an insured’s medical condition, if
not rendered to the insured within 48 hours could:
(I) Seriously jeopardize the life or health of the insured
or the ability of the insured to regain maximum function; or
(II) Subject the insured to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without receiving such care.
(2) Does not include emergency services.
Sec. 26. NRS 689A.0435 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0435 1. A health benefit plan must provide an option
of coverage for screening for and diagnosis of autism spectrum
disorders and for treatment of autism spectrum disorders for persons
covered by the policy under the age of [18] 27 years . [or, if enrolled
in high school, until the person reaches the age of 22 years.]
2. Optional coverage provided pursuant to this section must be
subject to [:
(a) A maximum benefit of not less than the actuarial equivalent
of $72,000 per year for applied behavior analysis treatment; and
(b) Copayment,] copayment, deductible and coinsurance
provisions and any other general exclusions or limitations of a
policy of health insurance to the same extent as other medical
services or prescription drugs covered by the policy.
3. A health benefit plan [that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance which provides coverage for outpatient care] shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, copayment or
coinsurance or require a longer waiting period for optional coverage
for [outpatient] care related to autism spectrum disorders than is
required for other [outpatient] care covered by the policy; [or]
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance [solely] because the person applying for
-
*SB398*

– 21 –
or covered by the policy uses or may use in the future any of the
services listed in subsection 1 [.] ; or
(c) Except as authorized by subsection 6, exclude coverage for
medically necessary care related to autism spectrum disorders
because the care is provided in a school or other educational
setting.
4. [Except as otherwise provided in subsections 1 and 2, an]
An insurer [who offers optional coverage pursuant to subsection 1]
shall not limit the number of visits an insured may make to any
person, entity or group for treatment of autism spectrum disorders.
5. Treatment of autism spectrum disorders [must] may be
identified in a treatment plan and [may] must include medically
necessary habilitative or rehabilitative care, prescription care,
psychiatric care, psychological care, behavioral therapy , applied
behavior analysis therapy or therapeutic care that is:
(a) Prescribed for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician or licensed psychologist; and
(b) Provided for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed
behavior analyst or other provider that is supervised by the licensed
physician, psychologist or behavior analyst.
 An insurer may request a copy of and review a treatment plan
that may be created pursuant to this subsection.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring an
insurer to provide reimbursement to a school for services delivered
through school services.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Applied behavior analysis” [means the design,
implementation and evaluation of environmental modifications
using behavioral stimuli and consequences to produce socially
significant improvement in human behavior, including, without
limitation, the use of direct observation, measurement and
functional analysis of the relations between environment and
behavior.] has the meaning ascribed to the term “practice of
applied behavior analysis” in NRS 641D.080.
(b) “Autism spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 427A.875.
(c) “Behavioral therapy” means any interactive therapy derived
from evidence-based research, including, without limitation, discrete
trial training, early intensive behavioral intervention, intensive
intervention programs, pivotal response training and verbal behavior
provided by a licensed psychologist, licensed behavior analyst,
licensed assistant behavior analyst or registered behavior technician.
-
*SB398*

– 22 –
(d) “Evidence-based research” means research that applies
rigorous, systematic and objective procedures to obtain valid
knowledge relevant to autism spectrum disorders.
(e) “Habilitative or rehabilitative care” means counseling,
guidance and professional services and treatment programs,
including, without limitation, applied behavior analysis, that are
necessary to develop, maintain and restore, to the maximum extent
practicable, the functioning of a person.
(f) “Licensed assistant behavior analyst” has the meaning
ascribed to the term “assistant behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.020.
(g) “Licensed behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.030.
(h) “Medically necessary” means any care, treatment,
intervention, service or item which will or is reasonably expected
to:
(1) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, disease
or disability;
(2) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental or
developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury, disease or
disability; or
(3) Assist a person to achieve or maintain maximum
function in performing daily activities.
(i) “Prescription care” means medications prescribed by a
licensed physician and any health-related services deemed medically
necessary to determine the need or effectiveness of the medications.
[(i)] (j) “Psychiatric care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
[(j)] (k) “Psychological care” means direct or consultative
services provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which
the psychologist practices.
[(k)] (l) “Registered behavior technician” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 641D.100.
[(l)] (m) “Screening for autism spectrum disorders” means
medically necessary assessments, evaluations or tests to screen and
diagnose whether a person has an autism spectrum disorder.
[(m)] (n) “Therapeutic care” means services provided by
licensed or certified speech-language pathologists, occupational
therapists and physical therapists.
[(n)] (o) “Treatment plan” means a plan to treat an autism
spectrum disorder that is prescribed by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist and may be developed pursuant to a
comprehensive evaluation in coordination with a licensed behavior
analyst.
-
*SB398*

– 23 –
Sec. 27. NRS 689A.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.430 1. An insurer shall not, when considering
eligibility for coverage or making payments under a policy of health
insurance, consider the availability of, or eligibility of a person for [,
medical] :
(a) Medical assistance under Medicaid [.] ; or
(b) Any other governmental program that may be used to pay
for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services,
including, without limitation, Medicare and any program to
provide benefits under the Social Security Act.
2. To the extent that payment has been made by Medicaid for
health care, an insurer:
(a) Shall treat Medicaid as having a valid and enforceable
assignment of an insured’s benefits regardless of any exclusion of
Medicaid or the absence of a written assignment; and
(b) May, as otherwise allowed by the policy, evidence of
coverage or contract and applicable law or regulation concerning
subrogation, seek to enforce any right of a recipient of Medicaid to
reimbursement against any other liable party if:
(1) It is so authorized pursuant to a contract with Medicaid
for managed care; or
(2) It has reimbursed Medicaid in full for the health care
provided by Medicaid to its insured.
3. If a state agency is assigned any rights of a person who is:
(a) Eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid; and
(b) Covered by a policy of health insurance,
 the insurer that issued the policy shall not impose any
requirements upon the state agency except requirements it imposes
upon the agents or assignees of other persons covered by the policy.
4. If a state agency is assigned any rights of an insured who is
eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid, an insurer shall:
(a) Upon request of the state agency, provide to the state agency
information regarding the insured to determine:
(1) Any period during which the insured or the insured’s
spouse or dependent may be or may have been covered by the
insurer; and
(2) The nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the
insurer, including, without limitation, the name and address of the
insured and the identifying number of the policy, evidence of
coverage or contract;
(b) Respond to any inquiry by the state agency regarding a claim
for payment for the provision of any medical item or service not
later than 3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item
or service; and
-
*SB398*

– 24 –
(c) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state agency
solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or
format of the claim form or failure to present proper documentation
at the point of sale that is the basis for the claim if:
(1) The claim is submitted by the state agency not later than
3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item or service;
and
(2) Any action by the state agency to enforce its rights with
respect to such claim is commenced not later than 6 years after the
submission of the claim.
5. As used in this section, “insurer” includes, without
limitation, a self-insured plan, group health plan as defined in
section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
1974, 29 U.S.C. § 1167(1), service benefit plan or other
organization that has issued a policy of health insurance or any other
party described in section 1902(a)(25)(A), (G) or (I) of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(25)(A), (G) or (I), as being
legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or
service.
Sec. 28. NRS 689B.0335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0335 1. A health benefit plan must provide coverage
for screening for and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and for
treatment of autism spectrum disorders to persons covered by the
policy of group health insurance under the age of [18] 27 years . [or,
if enrolled in high school, until the person reaches the age of 22
years.]
2. Coverage provided under this section is subject to [:
(a) A maximum benefit of the actuarial equivalent of $72,000
per year for applied behavior analysis treatment; and
(b) Copayment,] copayment, deductible and coinsurance
provisions and any other general exclusion or limitation of a policy
of group health insurance to the same extent as other medical
services or prescription drugs covered by the policy.
3. A health benefit plan [that offers or issues a policy of group
health insurance which provides coverage for outpatient care] shall
not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, copayment or
coinsurance or require a longer waiting period for coverage for
[outpatient] care related to autism spectrum disorders than is
required for other [outpatient] care covered by the policy; [or]
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance [solely] because the person
applying for or covered by the policy uses or may use in the future
any of the services listed in subsection 1 [.] ; or
-
*SB398*

– 25 –
(c) Except as authorized by subsection 7, exclude coverage for
medically necessary care related to autism spectrum disorders
because the care is provided in a school or other educational
setting.
4. [Except as otherwise provided in subsections 1 and 2, an]
An insurer shall not limit the number of visits an insured may make
to any person, entity or group for treatment of autism spectrum
disorders.
5. Treatment of autism spectrum disorders [must] may be
identified in a treatment plan and [may] must include medically
necessary habilitative or rehabilitative care, prescription care,
psychiatric care, psychological care, behavioral therapy , applied
behavior analysis therapy or therapeutic care that is:
(a) Prescribed for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician or licensed psychologist; and
(b) Provided for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed
behavior analyst or other provider that is supervised by the licensed
physician, psychologist or behavior analyst.
 An insurer may request a copy of and review a treatment plan
that may be created pursuant to this subsection.
6. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
[2011,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage required
by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal
which is in conflict with subsection 1 or 2 is void.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring an
insurer to provide reimbursement to a school for services delivered
through school services.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Applied behavior analysis” [means the design,
implementation and evaluation of environmental modifications
using behavioral stimuli and consequences to produce socially
significant improvement in human behavior, including, without
limitation, the use of direct observation, measurement and
functional analysis of the relations between environment and
behavior.] has the meaning ascribed to the term “practice of
applied behavior analysis” in NRS 641D.080.
(b) “Autism spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 427A.875.
(c) “Behavioral therapy” means any interactive therapy derived
from evidence-based research, including, without limitation, discrete
trial training, early intensive behavioral intervention, intensive
intervention programs, pivotal response training and verbal behavior
-
*SB398*

– 26 –
provided by a licensed psychologist, licensed behavior analyst,
licensed assistant behavior analyst or registered behavior technician.
(d) “Evidence-based research” means research that applies
rigorous, systematic and objective procedures to obtain valid
knowledge relevant to autism spectrum disorders.
(e) “Habilitative or rehabilitative care” means counseling,
guidance and professional services and treatment programs,
including, without limitation, applied behavior analysis, that are
necessary to develop, maintain and restore, to the maximum extent
practicable, the functioning of a person.
(f) “Licensed assistant behavior analyst” has the meaning
ascribed to the term “assistant behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.020.
(g) “Licensed behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.030.
(h) “Medically necessary” means any care, treatment,
intervention, service or item which will or is reasonably expected
to:
(1) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, disease
or disability;
(2) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental or
developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury, disease or
disability; or
(3) Assist a person to achieve or maintain maximum
function in performing daily activities.
(i) “Prescription care” means medications prescribed by a
licensed physician and any health-related services deemed medically
necessary to determine the need or effectiveness of the medications.
[(i)] (j) “Psychiatric care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
[(j)] (k) “Psychological care” means direct or consultative
services provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which
the psychologist practices.
[(k)] (l) “Registered behavior technician” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 641D.100.
[(l)] (m) “Screening for autism spectrum disorders” means
medically necessary assessments, evaluations or tests to screen and
diagnose whether a person has an autism spectrum disorder.
[(m)] (n) “Therapeutic care” means services provided by
licensed or certified speech-language pathologists, occupational
therapists and physical therapists.
[(n)] (o) “Treatment plan” means a plan to treat an autism
spectrum disorder that is prescribed by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist and may be developed pursuant to a
-
*SB398*

– 27 –
comprehensive evaluation in coordination with a licensed behavior
analyst.
Sec. 29. NRS 689B.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.300 1. An insurer shall not, when considering
eligibility for coverage or making payments under a group health
policy, consider the availability of, or eligibility of a person for [,
medical] :
(a) Medical assistance under Medicaid [.] ; or
(b) Any other governmental program that may be used to pay
for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services,
including, without limitation, Medicare and any program to
provide benefits under the Social Security Act.
2. To the extent that payment has been made by Medicaid for
health care, an insurer:
(a) Shall treat Medicaid as having a valid and enforceable
assignment of an insured’s benefits regardless of any exclusion of
Medicaid or the absence of a written assignment; and
(b) May, as otherwise allowed by the policy, evidence of
coverage or contract and applicable law or regulation concerning
subrogation, seek to enforce any rights of a recipient of Medicaid to
reimbursement against any other liable party if:
(1) It is so authorized pursuant to a contract with Medicaid
for managed care; or
(2) It has reimbursed Medicaid in full for the health care
provided by Medicaid to its insured.
3. If a state agency is assigned any rights of a person who is:
(a) Eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid; and
(b) Covered by a group health policy,
 the insurer that issued the policy shall not impose any
requirements upon the state agency except requirements it imposes
upon the agents or assignees of other persons covered by the policy.
4. If a state agency is assigned any rights of an insured who is
eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid, an insurer shall:
(a) Upon request of the state agency, provide to the state agency
information regarding the insured to determine:
(1) Any period during which the insured or the spouse or
dependent of the insured may be or may have been covered by the
insurer; and
(2) The nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the
insurer, including, without limitation, the name and address of the
insured and the identifying number of the policy;
(b) Respond to any inquiry by the state agency regarding a claim
for payment for the provision of any medical item or service not
later than 3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item
or service; and
-
*SB398*

– 28 –
(c) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state agency
solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or
format of the claim form or failure to present proper documentation
at the point of sale that is the basis for the claim if:
(1) The claim is submitted by the state agency not later than
3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item or service;
and
(2) Any action by the state agency to enforce its rights with
respect to such claim is commenced not later than 6 years after the
submission of the claim.
5. As used in this section, “insurer” includes, without
limitation, a self-insured plan, group health plan as defined in
section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
1974, 29 U.S.C. § 1167(1), service benefit plan or other
organization that has issued a group health policy or any other party
described in section 1902(a)(25)(A), (G) or (I) of the Social Security
Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(25)(A), (G) or (I), as being legally
responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service.
Sec. 30. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A carrier shall not, when considering eligibility for coverage or
making payments under a health benefit plan, consider the
availability of, or eligibility of a person for:
1. Medical assistance under Medicaid; or
2. Any other governmental program that may be used to pay
for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services,
including, without limitation, Medicare and any program to
provide benefits under the Social Security Act.
Sec. 31. NRS 689C.1655 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1655 1. A health benefit plan must provide coverage
for screening for and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and for
treatment of autism spectrum disorders to persons covered by the
health benefit plan under the age of [18] 27 years . [or, if enrolled in
high school, until the person reaches the age of 22 years.]
2. Coverage provided under this section is subject to [:
(a) A maximum benefit of the actuarial equivalent of $72,000
per year for applied behavior analysis treatment; and
(b) Copayment,] copayment, deductible and coinsurance
provisions and any other general exclusion or limitation of a health
benefit plan to the same extent as other medical services or
prescription drugs covered by the plan.
3. A health benefit plan [that offers or issues a policy of group
health insurance which provides coverage for outpatient care] shall
not:
-
*SB398*

– 29 –
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, copayment or
coinsurance or require a longer waiting period for coverage for
[outpatient] care related to autism spectrum disorders than is
required for other [outpatient] care covered by the plan; [or]
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan [solely] because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use in the future any of the services listed in
subsection 1 [.] ; or
(c) Except as authorized by subsection 7, exclude coverage for
medically necessary care related to autism spectrum disorders
because the care is provided in a school or other educational
setting.
4. [Except as otherwise provided in subsections 1 and 2, a] A
carrier shall not limit the number of visits an insured may make to
any person, entity or group for treatment of autism spectrum
disorders.
5. Treatment of autism spectrum disorders [must] may be
identified in a treatment plan and [may] must include medically
necessary habilitative or rehabilitative care, prescription care,
psychiatric care, psychological care, behavioral therapy , applied
behavior analysis therapy or therapeutic care that is:
(a) Prescribed for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician or licensed psychologist; and
(b) Provided for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed
behavior analyst or other provider that is supervised by the licensed
physician, psychologist or behavior analyst.
 A carrier may request a copy of and review a treatment plan that
may be created pursuant to this subsection.
6. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2011,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or
the renewal which is in conflict with subsection 1 or 2 is void.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
carrier to provide reimbursement to a school for services delivered
through school services.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Applied behavior analysis” [means the design,
implementation and evaluation of environmental modifications
using behavioral stimuli and consequences to produce socially
significant improvement in human behavior, including, without
limitation, the use of direct observation, measurement and
functional analysis of the relations between environment and
-
*SB398*

– 30 –
behavior.] has the meaning ascribed to the term “practice of
applied behavior analysis” in NRS 641D.080.
(b) “Autism spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 427A.875.
(c) “Behavioral therapy” means any interactive therapy derived
from evidence-based research, including, without limitation, discrete
trial training, early intensive behavioral intervention, intensive
intervention programs, pivotal response training and verbal behavior
provided by a licensed psychologist, licensed behavior analyst,
licensed assistant behavior analyst or registered behavior technician.
(d) “Evidence-based research” means research that applies
rigorous, systematic and objective procedures to obtain valid
knowledge relevant to autism spectrum disorders.
(e) “Habilitative or rehabilitative care” means counseling,
guidance and professional services and treatment programs,
including, without limitation, applied behavior analysis, that are
necessary to develop, maintain and restore, to the maximum extent
practicable, the functioning of a person.
(f) “Licensed assistant behavior analyst” has the meaning
ascribed to the term “assistant behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.020.
(g) “Licensed behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.030.
(h) “Medically necessary” means any care, treatment,
intervention, service or item which will or is reasonably expected
to:
(1) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, disease
or disability;
(2) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental or
developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury, disease or
disability; or
(3) Assist a person to achieve or maintain maximum
function in performing daily activities.
(i) “Prescription care” means medications prescribed by a
licensed physician and any health-related services deemed medically
necessary to determine the need or effectiveness of the medications.
[(i)] (j) “Psychiatric care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
[(j)] (k) “Psychological care” means direct or consultative
services provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which
the psychologist practices.
[(k)] (l) “Registered behavior technician” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 641D.100.
-
*SB398*

– 31 –
[(l)] (m) “Screening for autism spectrum disorders” means
medically necessary assessments, evaluations or tests to screen and
diagnose whether a person has an autism spectrum disorder.
[(m)] (n) “Therapeutic care” means services provided by
licensed or certified speech-language pathologists, occupational
therapists and physical therapists.
[(n)] (o) “Treatment plan” means a plan to treat an autism
spectrum disorder that is prescribed by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist and may be developed pursuant to a
comprehensive evaluation in coordination with a licensed behavior
analyst.
Sec. 32. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 30 of this act to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 33. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A benefit contract must provide coverage for screening for
and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and for treatment of
autism spectrum disorders to persons covered by the benefit
contract under the age of 27 years.
2. Coverage provided under this section is subject to
copayment, deductible and coinsurance provisions and any other
general exclusions or limitations of a benefit to the same extent as
other medical services or prescription drugs covered by the benefit
contract.
3. A society shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, copayment
or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period for coverage for
care related to autism spectrum disorders than is required for
other care covered by the benefit contract;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit
contract because the person applying for or covered by the benefit
contract uses or may use in the future any of the services listed in
subsection 1; or
(c) Except as authorized by subsection 7, exclude coverage for
medically necessary care related to autism spectrum disorders
because the care is provided in a school or other educational
setting.
4. A society shall not limit the number of visits an insured
may make to any person, entity or group for treatment of autism
spectrum disorders.
-
*SB398*

– 32 –
5. Treatment of autism spectrum disorders may be identified
in a treatment plan and must include medically necessary
habilitative or rehabilitative care, prescription care, psychiatric
care, psychological care, behavioral therapy, applied behavior
analysis therapy or therapeutic care that is:
(a) Prescribed for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician or licensed psychologist; and
(b) Provided for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed
behavior analyst or other provider that is supervised by the
licensed physician, psychologist or behavior analyst.
 A society may request a copy of and review a treatment plan
that may be created pursuant to this subsection.
6. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the benefit contract
or the renewal which is in conflict with subsection 1 or 2 is void.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
society to provide reimbursement to a school for services delivered
through school services.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Applied behavior analysis” has the meaning ascribed to
the term “practice of applied behavior analysis” in NRS 641D.080.
(b) “Autism spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 427A.875.
(c) “Behavioral therapy” means any interactive therapy
derived from evidence-based research, including, without
limitation, discrete trial training, early intensive behavioral
intervention, intensive intervention programs, pivotal response
training and verbal behavior provided by a licensed psychologist,
licensed behavior analyst, licensed assistant behavior analyst or
registered behavior technician.
(d) “Evidence-based research” means research that applies
rigorous, systematic and objective procedures to obtain valid
knowledge relevant to autism spectrum disorders.
(e) “Habilitative or rehabilitative care” means counseling,
guidance and professional services and treatment programs,
including, without limitation, applied behavior analysis, that are
necessary to develop, maintain and restore, to the maximum extent
practicable, the functioning of a person.
(f) “Licensed assistant behavior analyst” has the meaning
ascribed to the term “assistant behavior analyst” in
NRS 641D.020.
-
*SB398*

– 33 –
(g) “Licensed behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to
the term “behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.030.
(h) “Medically necessary” means any care, treatment,
intervention, service or item which will or is reasonably expected
to:
(1) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, disease
or disability;
(2) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental or
developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury, disease or
disability; or
(3) Assist a person to achieve or maintain maximum
function in performing daily activities.
(i) “Prescription care” means medications prescribed by a
licensed physician and any health-related services deemed
medically necessary to determine the need or effectiveness of the
medications.
(j) “Psychiatric care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
(k) “Psychological care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which the
psychologist practices.
(l) “Registered behavior technician” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 641D.100.
(m) “Screening for autism spectrum disorders” means
medically necessary assessments, evaluations or tests to screen
and diagnose whether a person has an autism spectrum disorder.
(n) “Therapeutic care” means services provided by licensed or
certified speech-language pathologists, occupational therapists
and physical therapists.
(o) “Treatment plan” means a plan to treat an autism
spectrum disorder that is prescribed by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist and may be developed pursuant to a
comprehensive evaluation in coordination with a licensed
behavior analyst.
Sec. 34. NRS 695A.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695A.151 1. A society shall not, when considering eligibility
for coverage or making payments under a certificate for health
benefits, consider the availability of, or eligibility of a person for [,
medical] :
(a) Medical assistance under Medicaid [.] ; or
(b) Any other governmental program that may be used to pay
for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services,
including, without limitation, Medicare and any program to
provide benefits under the Social Security Act.
-
*SB398*

– 34 –
2. To the extent that payment has been made by Medicaid for
health care, a society:
(a) Shall treat Medicaid as having a valid and enforceable
assignment of an insured’s benefits regardless of any exclusion of
Medicaid or the absence of a written assignment; and
(b) May, as otherwise allowed by its certificate for health
benefits, evidence of coverage or contract and applicable law or
regulation concerning subrogation, seek to enforce any
reimbursement rights of a recipient of Medicaid against any other
liable party if:
(1) It is so authorized pursuant to a contract with Medicaid
for managed care; or
(2) It has reimbursed Medicaid in full for the health care
provided by Medicaid to its insured.
3. If a state agency is assigned any rights of a person who is:
(a) Eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid; and
(b) Covered by a certificate for health benefits,
 the society that issued the health policy shall not impose any
requirements upon the state agency except requirements it imposes
upon the agents or assignees of other persons covered by the
certificate.
4. If a state agency is assigned any rights of an insured who is
eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid, a society that issues
a certificate for health benefits, evidence of coverage or contract
shall:
(a) Upon request of the state agency, provide to the state agency
information regarding the insured to determine:
(1) Any period during which the insured, a spouse or
dependent of the insured may be or may have been covered by the
society; and
(2) The nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the
society, including, without limitation, the name and address of the
insured and the identifying number of the certificate for health
benefits, evidence of coverage or contract;
(b) Respond to any inquiry by the state agency regarding a claim
for payment for the provision of any medical item or service not
later than 3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item
or service; and
(c) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state agency
solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or
format of the claim form or failure to present proper documentation
at the point of sale that is the basis for the claim if:
(1) The claim is submitted by the state agency not later than
3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item or service;
and
-
*SB398*

– 35 –
(2) Any action by the state agency to enforce its rights with
respect to such claim is commenced not later than 6 years after the
submission of the claim.
Sec. 35. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A policy of health insurance must provide coverage for
screening for and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and for
treatment of autism spectrum disorders to persons covered by the
policy under the age of 27 years.
2. Coverage provided under this section is subject to
copayment, deductible and coinsurance provisions and any other
general exclusions or limitations of a benefit to the same extent as
other medical services or prescription drugs covered by the policy.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, copayment
or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period for coverage for
care related to autism spectrum disorders than is required for
other care covered by the policy;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use in the future any of the
services listed in subsection 1; or
(c) Except as authorized by subsection 7, exclude coverage for
medically necessary care related to autism spectrum disorders
because the care is provided in a school or other educational
setting.
4. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers a
policy of health insurance shall not limit the number of visits an
insured may make to any person, entity or group for treatment of
autism spectrum disorders.
5. Treatment of autism spectrum disorders may be identified
in a treatment plan and must include medically necessary
habilitative or rehabilitative care, prescription care, psychiatric
care, psychological care, behavioral therapy, applied behavior
analysis therapy or therapeutic care that is:
(a) Prescribed for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician or licensed psychologist; and
(b) Provided for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed
behavior analyst or other provider that is supervised by the
licensed physician, psychologist or behavior analyst.
 A hospital or medical services corporation may request a copy
of and review a treatment plan that may be created pursuant to
this subsection.
-
*SB398*

– 36 –
6. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with subsection 1 or 2 is void.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
hospital or medical services corporation to provide reimbursement
to a school for services delivered through school services.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Applied behavior analysis” has the meaning ascribed to
the term “practice of applied behavior analysis” in NRS 641D.080.
(b) “Autism spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 427A.875.
(c) “Behavioral therapy” means any interactive therapy
derived from evidence-based research, including, without
limitation, discrete trial training, early intensive behavioral
intervention, intensive intervention programs, pivotal response
training and verbal behavior provided by a licensed psychologist,
licensed behavior analyst, licensed assistant behavior analyst or
registered behavior technician.
(d) “Evidence-based research” means research that applies
rigorous, systematic and objective procedures to obtain valid
knowledge relevant to autism spectrum disorders.
(e) “Habilitative or rehabilitative care” means counseling,
guidance and professional services and treatment programs,
including, without limitation, applied behavior analysis, that are
necessary to develop, maintain and restore, to the maximum extent
practicable, the functioning of a person.
(f) “Licensed assistant behavior analyst” has the meaning
ascribed to the term “assistant behavior analyst” in
NRS 641D.020.
(g) “Licensed behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to
the term “behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.030.
(h) “Medically necessary” means any care, treatment,
intervention, service or item which will or is reasonably expected
to:
(1) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, disease
or disability;
(2) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental or
developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury, disease or
disability; or
(3) Assist a person to achieve or maintain maximum
function in performing daily activities.
(i) “Prescription care” means medications prescribed by a
licensed physician and any health-related services deemed
-
*SB398*

– 37 –
medically necessary to determine the need or effectiveness of the
medications.
(j) “Psychiatric care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
(k) “Psychological care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which the
psychologist practices.
(l) “Registered behavior technician” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 641D.100.
(m) “Screening for autism spectrum disorders” means
medically necessary assessments, evaluations or tests to screen
and diagnose whether a person has an autism spectrum disorder.
(n) “Therapeutic care” means services provided by licensed or
certified speech-language pathologists, occupational therapists
and physical therapists.
(o) “Treatment plan” means a plan to treat an autism
spectrum disorder that is prescribed by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist and may be developed pursuant to a
comprehensive evaluation in coordination with a licensed
behavior analyst.
Sec. 36. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, subsections 2, 4, 17,
18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060,
inclusive, chapter 681B of NRS, NRS 686A.010 to
686A.315, inclusive, 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, 687B.010 to
687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070 to 687B.140, inclusive, 687B.150,
687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200 to 687B.255, inclusive, and
sections 2 to 24, inclusive, of this act, 687B.270, 687B.310 to
687B.380, inclusive, 687B.410, 687B.420, 687B.430, 687B.500 and
chapters 692B, 692C, 693A and 696B of NRS, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of this
chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 37. NRS 695B.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.340 1. A corporation shall not, when considering
eligibility for coverage or making payments under a contract,
consider the availability of, or any eligibility of a person for [,
medical] :
(a) Medical assistance under Medicaid [.] ; or
-
*SB398*

– 38 –
(b) Any other governmental program that may be used to pay
for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services,
including, without limitation, Medicare and any program to
provide benefits under the Social Security Act.
2. To the extent that payment has been made by Medicaid for
health care, a corporation:
(a) Shall treat Medicaid as having a valid and enforceable
assignment of benefits of a subscriber or policyholder or claimant
under the subscriber or policyholder regardless of any exclusion of
Medicaid or the absence of a written assignment; and
(b) May, as otherwise allowed by the policy, evidence of
coverage or contract and applicable law or regulation concerning
subrogation, seek to enforce any rights of a recipient of Medicaid
against any other liable party if:
(1) It is so authorized pursuant to a contract with Medicaid
for managed care; or
(2) It has reimbursed Medicaid in full for the health care
provided by Medicaid to its subscriber or policyholder.
3. If a state agency is assigned any rights of a person who is:
(a) Eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid; and
(b) Covered by a contract,
 the corporation that issued the contract shall not impose any
requirements upon the state agency except requirements it imposes
upon the agents or assignees of other persons covered by the same
contract.
4. If a state agency is assigned any rights of a subscriber or
policyholder who is eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid,
a corporation shall:
(a) Upon request of the state agency, provide to the state agency
information regarding the subscriber or policyholder to determine:
(1) Any period during which the subscriber or policyholder,
the spouse or a dependent of the subscriber or policyholder may be
or may have been covered by a contract; and
(2) The nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the
corporation, including, without limitation, the name and address of
the subscriber or policyholder and the identifying number of the
contract;
(b) Respond to any inquiry by the state agency regarding a claim
for payment for the provision of any medical item or service not
later than 3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item
or service; and
(c) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state agency
solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or
format of the claim form or failure to present proper documentation
at the point of sale that is the basis for the claim if:
-
*SB398*

– 39 –
(1) The claim is submitted by the state agency not later than
3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item or service;
and
(2) Any action by the state agency to enforce its rights with
respect to such claim is commenced not later than 6 years after the
submission of the claim.
Sec. 38. NRS 695C.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.163 1. A health maintenance organization shall not,
when considering eligibility for coverage or making payments under
a health care plan, consider the availability of, or eligibility of a
person for [, medical] :
(a) Medical assistance under Medicaid [.] ; or
(b) Any other governmental program that may be used to pay
for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services,
including, without limitation, Medicare and any program to
provide benefits under the Social Security Act.
2. To the extent that payment has been made by Medicaid for
health care, a health maintenance organization:
(a) Shall treat Medicaid as having a valid and enforceable
assignment of benefits due an enrollee or claimant under the
enrollee regardless of any exclusion of Medicaid or the absence of a
written assignment; and
(b) May, as otherwise allowed by its plan, evidence of coverage
or contract and applicable law or regulation concerning subrogation,
seek to enforce any rights of a recipient of Medicaid to
reimbursement against any other liable party if:
(1) It is so authorized pursuant to a contract with Medicaid
for managed care; or
(2) It has reimbursed Medicaid in full for the health care
provided by Medicaid to its enrollee.
3. If a state agency is assigned any rights of a person who is:
(a) Eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid; and
(b) Covered by a health care plan,
 the organization responsible for the health care plan shall not
impose any requirements upon the state agency except requirements
it imposes upon the agents or assignees of other persons covered by
the same plan.
4. If a state agency is assigned any rights of an enrollee who is
eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid, a health
maintenance organization shall:
(a) Upon request of the state agency, provide to the state agency
information regarding the enrollee to determine:
(1) Any period during which the enrollee, the spouse or a
dependent of the enrollee may be or may have been covered by the
health care plan; and
-
*SB398*

– 40 –
(2) The nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the
organization, including, without limitation, the name and address of
the enrollee and the identifying number of the health care plan;
(b) Respond to any inquiry by the state agency regarding a claim
for payment for the provision of any medical item or service not
later than 3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item
or service; and
(c) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state agency
solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or
format of the claim form or failure to present proper documentation
at the point of sale that is the basis for the claim if:
(1) The claim is submitted by the state agency not later than
3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item or service;
and
(2) Any action by the state agency to enforce its rights with
respect to such claim is commenced not later than 6 years after the
submission of the claim.
Sec. 39. NRS 695C.1717 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1717 1. A health care plan issued by a health
maintenance organization must provide coverage for screening for
and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and for treatment of
autism spectrum disorders to persons covered by the health care
plan under the age of [18] 27 years . [or, if enrolled in high school,
until the person reaches the age of 22 years.]
2. Coverage provided under this section is subject to [:
(a) A maximum benefit of the actuarial equivalent of $72,000
per year for applied behavior analysis treatment; and
(b) Copayment,] copayment, deductible and coinsurance
provisions and any other general exclusion or limitation of a health
care plan to the same extent as other medical services or prescription
drugs covered by the plan.
3. A health care plan [issued by a health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for outpatient care] shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, copayment or
coinsurance or require a longer waiting period for coverage for
[outpatient] care related to autism spectrum disorders than is
required for other [outpatient] care covered by the plan; [or]
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
[solely] because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use in the future any of the services listed in subsection 1 [.]
; or
(c) Except as authorized by subsection 7, exclude coverage for
medically necessary care related to autism spectrum disorders
-
*SB398*

– 41 –
because the care is provided in a school or other educational
setting.
4. [Except as otherwise provided in subsections 1 and 2, a] A
health maintenance organization shall not limit the number of visits
an enrollee may make to any person, entity or group for treatment of
autism spectrum disorders.
5. Treatment of autism spectrum disorders [must] may be
identified in a treatment plan and [may] must include medically
necessary habilitative or rehabilitative care, prescription care,
psychiatric care, psychological care, behavioral therapy , applied
behavior analysis therapy or therapeutic care that is:
(a) Prescribed for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician or licensed psychologist; and
(b) Provided for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed
behavior analyst or other provider that is supervised by the licensed
physician, psychologist or behavior analyst.
 A health maintenance organization may request a copy of and
review a treatment plan that may be created pursuant to this
subsection.
6. Evidence of coverage subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2011,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
evidence of coverage or the renewal which is in conflict with
subsection 1 or 2 is void.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
health maintenance organization to provide reimbursement to a
school for services delivered through school services.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Applied behavior analysis” [means the design,
implementation and evaluation of environmental modifications
using behavioral stimuli and consequences to produce socially
significant improvement in human behavior, including, without
limitation, the use of direct observation, measurement and
functional analysis of the relations between environment and
behavior.] has the meaning ascribed to the term “practice of
applied behavior analysis” in NRS 641D.080.
(b) “Autism spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 427A.875.
(c) “Behavioral therapy” means any interactive therapy derived
from evidence-based research, including, without limitation, discrete
trial training, early intensive behavioral intervention, intensive
intervention programs, pivotal response training and verbal behavior
-
*SB398*

– 42 –
provided by a licensed psychologist, licensed behavior analyst,
licensed assistant behavior analyst or registered behavior technician.
(d) “Evidence-based research” means research that applies
rigorous, systematic and objective procedures to obtain valid
knowledge relevant to autism spectrum disorders.
(e) “Habilitative or rehabilitative care” means counseling,
guidance and professional services and treatment programs,
including, without limitation, applied behavior analysis, that are
necessary to develop, maintain and restore, to the maximum extent
practicable, the functioning of a person.
(f) “Licensed assistant behavior analyst” has the meaning
ascribed to the term “assistant behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.020.
(g) “Licensed behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.030.
(h) “Medically necessary” means any care, treatment,
intervention, service or item which will or is reasonably expected
to:
(1) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, disease
or disability;
(2) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental or
developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury, disease or
disability; or
(3) Assist a person to achieve or maintain maximum
function in performing daily activities.
(i) “Prescription care” means medications prescribed by a
licensed physician and any health-related services deemed medically
necessary to determine the need or effectiveness of the medications.
[(i)] (j) “Psychiatric care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
[(j)] (k) “Psychological care” means direct or consultative
services provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which
the psychologist practices.
[(k)] (l) “Registered behavior technician” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 641D.100.
[(l)] (m) “Screening for autism spectrum disorders” means
medically necessary assessments, evaluations or tests to screen and
diagnose whether a person has an autism spectrum disorder.
[(m)] (n) “Therapeutic care” means services provided by
licensed or certified speech-language pathologists, occupational
therapists and physical therapists.
[(n)] (o) “Treatment plan” means a plan to treat an autism
spectrum disorder that is prescribed by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist and may be developed pursuant to a
-
*SB398*

– 43 –
comprehensive evaluation in coordination with a licensed behavior
analyst.
Sec. 40. NRS 695F.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695F.440 1. An organization shall not, when considering
eligibility for coverage or making payments under any evidence of
coverage, consider the availability of, or eligibility of a person for [,
medical] :
(a) Medical assistance under Medicaid [.] ; or
(b) Any other governmental program that may be used to pay
for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services,
including, without limitation, Medicare and any program to
provide benefits under the Social Security Act.
2. To the extent that payment has been made by Medicaid for
health care, a prepaid limited health service organization:
(a) Shall treat Medicaid as having a valid and enforceable
assignment of benefits due a subscriber or claimant under the
subscriber regardless of any exclusion of Medicaid or the absence of
a written assignment; and
(b) May, as otherwise allowed by its evidence of coverage or
contract and applicable law or regulation concerning subrogation,
seek to enforce any rights of a recipient of Medicaid against any
other liable party if:
(1) It is so authorized pursuant to a contract with Medicaid
for managed care; or
(2) It has reimbursed Medicaid in full for the health care
provided by Medicaid to its subscriber.
3. If a state agency is assigned any rights of a person who is:
(a) Eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid; and
(b) Covered by any evidence of coverage,
 the prepaid limited health service organization that issued the
evidence of coverage shall not impose any requirements upon the
state agency except requirements it imposes upon the agents or
assignees of other persons covered by any evidence of coverage.
4. If a state agency is assigned any rights of a subscriber who is
eligible for medical assistance under Medicaid, a prepaid limited
health service organization shall:
(a) Upon request of the state agency, provide to the state agency
information regarding the subscriber to determine:
(1) Any period during which the subscriber, the spouse or a
dependent of the subscriber may be or may have been covered by
the organization; and
(2) The nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the
organization, including, without limitation, the name and address of
the subscriber and the identifying number of the evidence of
coverage;
-
*SB398*

– 44 –
(b) Respond to any inquiry by the state agency regarding a claim
for payment for the provision of any medical item or service not
later than 3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item
or service; and
(c) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state agency
solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or
format of the claim form or failure to present proper documentation
at the point of sale that is the basis for the claim if:
(1) The claim is submitted by the state agency not later than
3 years after the date of the provision of the medical item or service;
and
(2) Any action by the state agency to enforce its rights with
respect to such claim is commenced not later than 6 years after the
submission of the claim.
Sec. 41. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A managed care organization shall not, when considering
eligibility for coverage or making payments under a health care
plan, consider the availability of, or eligibility of a person for:
1. Medical assistance under Medicaid; or
2. Any other governmental program that may be used to pay
for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services,
including, without limitation, Medicare and any program to
provide benefits under the Social Security Act.
Sec. 42. NRS 695G.053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695G.053 “Medical or scientific evidence” means evidence
found in the following sources:
1. Peer-reviewed scientific studies published in or accepted for
publication by medical journals that meet nationally recognized
requirements for scientific manuscripts and that submit most of their
published articles for review by experts who are not part of the
editorial staff;
2. Peer-reviewed medical literature, including literature
relating to therapies reviewed and approved by a qualified
institutional review board, biomedical compendia and other medical
literature that meet the criteria of the National Library of Medicine
of the National Institutes of Health for indexing in Index Medicus
(MEDLINE) and Elsevier for indexing in Excerpta Medica
(EMBASE);
3. Medical journals recognized by the Secretary of Health and
Human Services pursuant to section 1861(t)(2) of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395x;
4. The following standard reference compendia:
(a) AHFS Drug Information published by the American Society
of Health-System Pharmacists;
-
*SB398*

– 45 –
(b) Drug Facts and Comparisons published by Wolter Kluwers
Health;
(c) Accepted Dental Therapeutics published by the American
Dental Association; [and]
(d) The United States Pharmacopoeia’s Drug Quality and
Information Program; and
(e) The Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders
published by the American Psychiatric Association;
5. Findings, studies or research conducted by or under the
auspices of the Federal Government and nationally recognized
federal research institutes, including, without limitation:
(a) The Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality;
(b) The National Institutes of Health;
(c) The National Cancer Institute;
(d) The National Academy of Sciences of the National
Academies;
(e) The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;
(f) The Food and Drug Administration; and
(g) Any national board recognized by the National Institutes of
Health for the purpose of evaluating the medical value of health care
services; or
6. Any other source of medical or scientific evidence that is
comparable to the sources listed in subsections 1 to 5, inclusive.
Sec. 43. NRS 695G.1645 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1645 1. A health care plan issued by a managed care
organization for group coverage must provide coverage for
screening for and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and for
treatment of autism spectrum disorders to persons covered by the
health care plan under the age of [18] 27 years . [or, if enrolled in
high school, until the person reaches the age of 22 years.]
2. A health care plan issued by a managed care organization for
individual coverage must provide an option for coverage for
screening for and diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and
for treatment of autism spectrum disorders to persons covered by the
health care plan under the age of [18] 27 years . [or, if enrolled in
high school, until the person reaches the age of 22 years.]
3. Coverage provided under this section is subject to [:
(a) A maximum benefit of the actuarial equivalent of $72,000
per year for applied behavior analysis treatment; and
(b) Copayment,] copayment, deductible and coinsurance
provisions and any other general exclusion or limitation of a health
care plan to the same extent as other medical services or prescription
drugs covered by the plan.
-
*SB398*

– 46 –
4. A managed care organization [that offers or issues a health
care plan which provides coverage for outpatient care] shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, copayment or
coinsurance or require a longer waiting period for coverage for
[outpatient] care related to autism spectrum disorders than is
required for other [outpatient] care covered by the plan; [or]
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
[solely] because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use in the future any of the services listed in subsection 1 [.]
; or
(c) Except as authorized by subsection 8, exclude coverage for
medically necessary care related to autism spectrum disorders
because the care is provided in a school or other educational
setting.
5. [Except as otherwise provided in subsections 1, 2 and 3, a] A
managed care organization shall not limit the number of visits an
insured may make to any person, entity or group for treatment of
autism spectrum disorders.
6. Treatment of autism spectrum disorders [must] may be
identified in a treatment plan and [may] must include medically
necessary habilitative or rehabilitative care, prescription care,
psychiatric care, psychological care, behavioral therapy , applied
behavior analysis therapy or therapeutic care that is:
(a) Prescribed for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician or licensed psychologist; and
(b) Provided for a person diagnosed with an autism spectrum
disorder by a licensed physician, licensed psychologist, licensed
behavior analyst or other provider that is supervised by the licensed
physician, psychologist or behavior analyst.
 A managed care organization may request a copy of and review a
treatment plan that may be created pursuant to this subsection.
7. An evidence of coverage subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2011,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
evidence of coverage or the renewal which is in conflict with
subsection 1 or 3 is void.
8. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
managed care organization to provide reimbursement to a school for
services delivered through school services.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Applied behavior analysis” [means the design,
implementation and evaluation of environmental modifications
using behavioral stimuli and consequences to produce socially
significant improvement in human behavior, including, without
-
*SB398*

– 47 –
limitation, the use of direct observation, measurement and
functional analysis of the relations between environment and
behavior.] has the meaning ascribed to the term “practice of
applied behavior analysis” in NRS 641D.080.
(b) “Autism spectrum disorder” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 427A.875.
(c) “Behavioral therapy” means any interactive therapy derived
from evidence-based research, including, without limitation, discrete
trial training, early intensive behavioral intervention, intensive
intervention programs, pivotal response training and verbal behavior
provided by a licensed psychologist, licensed behavior analyst,
licensed assistant behavior analyst or registered behavior technician.
(d) “Evidence-based research” means research that applies
rigorous, systematic and objective procedures to obtain valid
knowledge relevant to autism spectrum disorders.
(e) “Habilitative or rehabilitative care” means counseling,
guidance and professional services and treatment programs,
including, without limitation, applied behavior analysis, that are
necessary to develop, maintain and restore, to the maximum extent
practicable, the functioning of a person.
(f) “Licensed assistant behavior analyst” has the meaning
ascribed to the term “assistant behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.020.
(g) “Licensed behavior analyst” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “behavior analyst” in NRS 641D.030.
(h) “Medically necessary” means any care, treatment,
intervention, service or item which will or is reasonably expected
to:
(1) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, disease
or disability;
(2) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental or
developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury, disease or
disability; or
(3) Assist a person to achieve or maintain maximum
function in performing daily activities.
(i) “Prescription care” means medications prescribed by a
licensed physician and any health-related services deemed medically
necessary to determine the need or effectiveness of the medications.
[(i)] (j) “Psychiatric care” means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
[(j)] (k) “Psychological care” means direct or consultative
services provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which
the psychologist practices.
[(k)] (l) “Registered behavior technician” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 641D.100.
-
*SB398*

– 48 –
[(l)] (m) “Screening for autism spectrum disorders” means
medically necessary assessments, evaluations or tests to screen and
diagnose whether a person has an autism spectrum disorder.
[(m)] (n) “Therapeutic care” means services provided by
licensed or certified speech-language pathologists, occupational
therapists and physical therapists.
[(n)] (o) “Treatment plan” means a plan to treat an autism
spectrum disorder that is prescribed by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist and may be developed pursuant to a
comprehensive evaluation in coordination with a licensed behavior
analyst.
Sec. 44. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
sections 48 to 68, inclusive, of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to
432.133, inclusive, 432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to
444.430, inclusive, and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all
other provisions of law relating to the functions of the divisions of
the Department, but is not responsible for the clinical activities of
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health or the professional line
activities of the other divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
-
*SB398*

– 49 –
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 45. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
-
*SB398*

– 50 –
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of subsection 2 of
NRS 687B.225, subsections 1, 3 and 5 to 8, inclusive, of NRS
687B.225, NRS 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6
and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive,
689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive, 689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287
and 689B.500 and sections 2 to 24, inclusive, of this act apply to
coverage provided pursuant to this paragraph, except that the
provisions of NRS 689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only
apply to coverage for active officers and employees of the
governing body, or the dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
-
*SB398*

– 51 –
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 46. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, paragraphs (b), (c) and
(d) of subsection 2 of NRS 687B.225, subsections 1, 3 and 5 to 8,
inclusive, of NRS 687B.225, NRS 687B.352, 687B.409, 687B.692,
687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255, 695C.1723,
695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162, 695G.1635, 695G.164,
695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167, 695G.1675, 695G.170 to
695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to 695G.174, inclusive,
695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241
-
*SB398*

– 52 –
to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and 695G.415, and sections 2 to
24, inclusive, of this act in the same manner as an insurer that is
licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required to comply with those
provisions.
Sec. 47. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 48 to 68, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 48. 1. The provisions of sections 49 to 68, inclusive, of
this act and any policies developed pursuant thereto do not apply
to the delivery of services to recipients of Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program through managed care in
accordance with NRS 422.273.
2. A health maintenance organization or other managed care
organization that enters into a contract with the Department or the
Division pursuant to NRS 422.273 to provide health care services
to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program shall comply with NRS
687B.225 and sections 2 to 24, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 49. As used in sections 49 to 68, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 50 to 55, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 50. “Adverse determination” means a determination by
the Department that an admission, availability of care, continued
stay or other medical care or dental care that is a covered benefit
has been reviewed and, based upon the information provided, does
not meet the Department’s requirements for medical necessity,
appropriateness, health care setting, level of care or effectiveness,
and the requested care or service or payment for the care or
service is therefore denied, reduced or terminated.
Sec. 51. “Emergency services” means health care services
that are provided by a provider of health care to screen and to
stabilize a recipient after the sudden onset of a medical condition
that manifests itself by symptoms of such sufficient severity that a
prudent person would believe that the absence of immediate
medical attention could result in:
1. Serious jeopardy to the health of the recipient;
2. Serious jeopardy to the health of an unborn child of the
recipient;
3. Serious impairment of a bodily function of the recipient; or
4. Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part of the
recipient.
Sec. 52. “Individually identifiable health information”
means information relating to the provision of medical or dental
care to a recipient:
-
*SB398*

– 53 –
1. That specifically identifies the recipient; or
2. For which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the
information can be used to identify the recipient.
Sec. 53. “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.055.
Sec. 54. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695G.070.
Sec. 55. “Recipient” means a natural person who receives
benefits through Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, as applicable.
Sec. 56. 1. The Department, with respect to Medicaid and
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, shall establish written
procedures for obtaining prior authorization for medical or dental
care which must include, without limitation:
(a) A list of the specific goods and services for which the
Department requires prior authorization; and
(b) A description of the clinical review criteria used by the
Department.
2. The Department shall publish the written procedures for
obtaining prior authorization established by the Department
pursuant to subsection 1, including, without limitation, the clinical
review criteria, on an Internet website maintained by the
Department:
(a) Using clear language that is understandable to an ordinary
layperson, where practicable; and
(b) In a place that is readily accessible and conspicuous to
recipients and the public.
3. If the Department amends the procedure for obtaining
prior authorization established pursuant to subsection 1,
including, without limitation, changing the goods and services for
which the Department requires prior authorization or changing
the clinical review criteria used by the Department, the
Department shall:
(a) Transmit a notice containing a summary of the changes
made to the procedure to each recipient and each provider of
goods or services under Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, as applicable; and
(b) Update the information published on its Internet website
pursuant to subsection 2 to reflect the amended procedure for
obtaining prior authorization and the date on which the amended
procedure takes effect.
4. A change to the Department’s procedure for obtaining
prior authorization may not take effect until 60 days have passed
after the later of:
-
*SB398*

– 54 –
(a) The date on which the Department transmitted the notice to
recipients and providers of goods or services under Medicaid or
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, as applicable, pursuant
to paragraph (a) of subsection 3; or
(b) The date on which the Department updated the
information published on its Internet website pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 3.
5. The Department shall not deny a claim based on the
failure of a recipient to obtain prior authorization for medical or
dental care if the procedure for obtaining prior authorization
established by the Department pursuant to this section did not
require the recipient to obtain prior authorization for that medical
or dental care on the date that the medical or dental care was
provided to the recipient.
6. As used in this section, “clinical review criteria” means
any written screening procedure, formulary decision abstract,
clinical protocol, practice guideline or other criteria used by the
Department to determine the necessity and appropriateness of
medical or dental care.
Sec. 57. 1. When determining whether to approve or make
an adverse determination on a request for prior authorization, the
Department shall determine whether the purported recipient is:
(a) Currently covered by Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program; and
(b) Eligible to receive coverage for the goods or services to
which the request pertains.
2. Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, and except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
Department, with respect to Medicaid and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, shall approve or make an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization submitted by or
on behalf of a recipient and notify the recipient and his or her
provider of health care of the approval or adverse determination:
(a) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 48 hours
after receiving the request.
(b) For urgent health care, within 24 hours after receiving the
request.
3. If the Department requires additional, medically relevant
information or documentation, including, without limitation, an
in-person evaluation of the recipient or a second opinion from a
different provider of health care, in order to adequately evaluate a
request for prior authorization, the Department shall:
(a) Notify the recipient and the provider of health care who
submitted the request within the applicable amount of time
-
*SB398*

– 55 –
described in subsection 2 that additional information is required to
evaluate the request;
(b) Include within the notification sent pursuant to paragraph
(a) a description, with reasonable specificity, of the information
that the Department requires to make a determination on the
request for prior authorization; and
(c) Approve or make an adverse determination on the request:
(1) For non-urgent medical or dental care, within 48 hours
after receiving the information.
(2) For urgent health care, within 24 hours after receiving
the information.
4. As used in this section, “urgent health care”:
(a) Means health care that, in the opinion of a provider of
health care with knowledge of a recipient’s medical condition, if
not rendered to the recipient within 48 hours could:
(1) Seriously jeopardize the life or health of the recipient or
the ability of the recipient to regain maximum function; or
(2) Subject the recipient to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without receiving such care.
(b) Does not include emergency services.
Sec. 58. 1. The Department, with respect to Medicaid and
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, shall not make an
adverse determination on a request for prior authorization unless
the adverse determination is made by a physician or, for a request
relating to dental care, a dentist, who:
(a) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine or
dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of the United
States;
(b) Is of the same or similar specialty as a physician or dentist,
as applicable, who typically manages or treats the medical or
dental condition or provides the medical or dental care involved in
the request; and
(c) Has experience treating or managing the medical or dental
condition involved in the request.
2. If a physician or dentist described in subsection 1 is
considering making an adverse determination on a request for
prior authorization on the basis that the medical or dental care
involved in the request is not medically necessary, the Department
shall:
(a) Immediately notify the provider of health care who
submitted the request that the medical necessity of the requested
care is being questioned by the Department; and
(b) Offer the provider of health care an opportunity to speak
with the physician or dentist, as applicable, over the telephone or
by videoconference to discuss the clinical issues involved in the
-
*SB398*

– 56 –
request before the physician or dentist renders an initial
determination on the request.
3. Upon rendering an adverse determination on a request for
prior authorization, the Department shall immediately transmit to
the recipient to whom the request pertains a written notice that
contains:
(a) A specific description of all reasons that the Department
made the adverse determination;
(b) A description of any documentation that the Department
requested from the recipient or a provider of health care of the
recipient and did not receive or deemed insufficient, if the failure
to receive sufficient documentation contributed to the adverse
determination;
(c) A statement that the recipient has the right to appeal the
adverse determination;
(d) Instructions, written in clear language that is
understandable to an ordinary layperson, describing how the
recipient can appeal the adverse determination through the
process established pursuant to subsection 4; and
(e) A description of any documentation that may be necessary
or pertinent to a potential appeal.
4. The Department shall establish a process that allows a
recipient to appeal an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization. The process must allow for the clear resolution of
each appeal within a reasonable time.
5. The Department shall not uphold on appeal an adverse
determination pertaining to a request for prior authorization
unless the decision on the appeal is made by a physician or, for an
appeal relating to dental care, a dentist, who:
(a) Holds an unrestricted license to practice medicine or
dentistry, as applicable, in any state or territory of the United
States;
(b) Is actively practicing medicine or dentistry, as applicable,
within the same or similar specialty as a physician or dentist, as
applicable, who typically manages or treats the medical or dental
condition or provides the medical or dental care involved in the
request and has been actively practicing in such specialty for at
least 5 consecutive years preceding the date on which the
physician or dentist, as applicable, makes the determination on the
appeal;
(c) Is knowledgeable of and has experience treating or
managing the medical or dental condition involved in the request;
(d) Was not involved in making the adverse determination that
is the subject of the appeal;
-
*SB398*

– 57 –
(e) Has no financial interest in the outcome of the request for
prior authorization that is the subject of the appeal;
(f) Is not employed by or contracted with the Department or
any administrator contracted by the Department except:
(1) To participate in Medicaid as a provider of services;
(2) To make determinations on appeals of adverse
determinations; or
(3) For the purposes described in both subparagraphs (1)
and (2); and
(g) Considers all known clinical aspects of the medical or
dental care involved in the request, including, without limitation:
(1) The medical records of the recipient that are provided
or accessible to the Department, including those records provided
to the Department by the recipient or a provider of health care of
the recipient;
(2) The clinical review criteria adopted by the Department
pursuant to section 56 of this act; and
(3) Medical or scientific evidence provided to the
Department by the provider of health care who requested prior
authorization for the care at issue.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Administrator” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 683A.025.
(b) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695G.053.
Sec. 59. 1. If the Department approves a request for prior
authorization, the Department shall not revoke, limit, condition or
restrict the approval due to a subsequent change in the coverage
under Medicaid or the criteria under which the approval was
initially issued.
2. If the Department approves a request for prior
authorization that relates to a chronic or long-term condition that
is specifically identified in the request, the approval remains valid
for the entire length of the treatment, subject to the provisions of
section 60 of this act. The Department shall not require a recipient
who receives an approval pursuant to this subsection to obtain
additional prior authorization for the same care so long as the
recipient is covered by Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program.
3. Within the first 90 days that a recipient is enrolled in
Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program, as
applicable, the Department shall honor a request for prior
authorization that has been approved by a health carrier or other
entity that previously provided the recipient with coverage for
medical or dental care if:
-
*SB398*

– 58 –
(a) The approval was issued within the 12 months immediately
preceding the first day of the enrollment of the recipient; and
(b) The specific medical or dental care included within the
request is not affirmatively excluded under the terms and
conditions of Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, as applicable.
4. The Department may undertake an independent review of
the care approved by the previous health carrier of a recipient
which is subject to the requirements of subsection 3 for the
purpose of granting its own approval of the care. The Department
may not deny approval in violation of subsection 3 as the result of
such a review.
5. As used in this section, “health carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 6 of this act.
Sec. 60. 1. The Department may revoke, limit, condition or
restrict an approval granted for a request for prior authorization
only if:
(a) The care to which the request pertains was not provided
within 45 business days after the Department received the request;
(b) The Department determines that any of the conditions
under which the Department may refuse to pay a claim pursuant
to subsection 4, 5 or 6 of section 61 of this act exist; or
(c) The Department:
(1) Determines that the recipient was not covered by
Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program on the date
on which the approved care was provided; and
(2) Has satisfied the conditions of subsection 2.
2. The Department may revoke, limit, condition or restrict an
approval granted for a request for prior authorization pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 only if, before the care to which the
request pertains was provided, the Department provided to the
provider of health care who provided the care a mechanism by
which the provider of health care could confirm whether the
recipient is:
(a) Covered by Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program; and
(b) Eligible to receive coverage for the care on the date on
which the care is scheduled to be provided, including, without
limitation, the length of any approved inpatient stay in a medical
facility.
3. As used in this section, “medical facility” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 449.0151.
Sec. 61. If the Department has approved a request for prior
authorization, the Department shall not refuse to pay a claim for
the medical or dental care approved by the Department or refuse
-
*SB398*

– 59 –
to pay a provider of health care at the applicable rate for the
approved care unless:
1. The approval is later revoked, limited, conditioned or
restricted pursuant to section 60 of this act in a manner that
precludes payment of the claim.
2. The medical or dental care at issue was never performed.
3. The claim for the medical or dental care was not timely
submitted in accordance with the applicable terms and conditions
of Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program, as
applicable.
4. The medical or dental care at issue was not a covered
benefit by Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program,
as applicable, on the date on which the care was provided.
5. The Department possesses specific evidence that the
recipient to whom the approval pertains or the provider of health
care of the recipient made a material or fraudulent representation
to obtain the approval or fraudulently obtained the approval by
other means.
6. The provider of health care was not participating in
Medicaid as a provider of services on the date on which the care
was provided.
Sec. 62. 1. The Department shall not require prior
authorization for a surgical procedure or other invasive procedure
that is related or incidental to, and performed during the course
of, a different procedure for which the Department:
(a) Has granted prior authorization; or
(b) Does not require prior authorization.
2. The Department shall not deny a request for prior
authorization for a covered prescription drug that is prescribed for
the purpose of treating or managing pain if the recipient to whom
the request pertains is diagnosed with a terminal condition and the
diagnosis of the condition is indicated on the request for prior
authorization.
3. The Department shall act on a request for prior
authorization relating to a course of treatment for a mental,
emotional, behavioral or substance use disorder or condition in a
manner that is consistent with the manner that the Department
would act on a request for prior authorization relating to a course
of treatment for any other type of disease or condition. The
Department shall additionally treat an appeal of an adverse
determination on a request for prior authorization relating to a
course of treatment for a mental, emotional, behavioral or
substance use disorder or condition in the same manner as it
would act on any other appeal of an adverse determination.
-
*SB398*

– 60 –
4. As used in this section, “terminal condition” means an
incurable and irreversible condition that, without the
administration of life-sustaining treatment, will, in the opinion of
the attending physician, physician assistant or attending advanced
practice registered nurse, result in death within a relatively short
time.
Sec. 63. 1. The Department, with respect to Medicaid and
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, shall not require prior
authorization for covered emergency services, including, where
applicable, transportation by ambulance to a hospital or other
medical facility.
2. If the Department requires a recipient or his or her
provider of health care to notify the Department that the recipient
has been admitted to a hospital to receive emergency services or
has received emergency services, the Department shall not require
a recipient or a provider of health care to transmit such a notice
earlier than the end of the business day immediately following the
day on which the recipient was admitted or the emergency services
were provided, as applicable.
3. The Department shall not deny coverage for emergency
services covered by Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program that are medically necessary. Emergency services are
presumed to be medically necessary if, within 72 hours after a
recipient is admitted to receive emergency services, the recipient’s
provider of health care transmits to the Department a certification,
in writing, that the condition of the recipient required emergency
services. The Department may rebut that presumption by
establishing, by clear and convincing evidence, that the emergency
services were not medically necessary.
4. If a recipient receives emergency services and must
additionally receive post-evaluation or post-stabilization medical
care, and the Department requires prior authorization for the post-
evaluation or post-stabilization medical care, the Department shall
approve or make an adverse determination on a request for prior
authorization for such care within 60 minutes after receiving the
request.
Sec. 64. 1. The Department shall exempt a provider of
health care from the requirement to obtain prior authorization for
a specific good or service if, within the immediately preceding 12
months, the Department approved 80 percent or more of the
requests for prior authorization for that specific good or service
submitted by the provider of health care. If a provider of health
care qualifies for an exemption pursuant to this section, the
Department shall:
-
*SB398*

– 61 –
(a) Automatically grant the exemption without requiring the
provider of health care to submit a request for the exemption; and
(b) Transmit to the provider of health care after granting the
exemption a notice that includes:
(1) A statement that the provider of health care has been
granted an exemption from the requirement to obtain prior
authorization from the Department for the specific goods and
services listed pursuant to subparagraph (2);
(2) A list of goods and services to which the exemption
applies; and
(3) The date on which the exemption expires, which must
not be earlier than 12 months after the date on which the
Department granted the exemption.
2. The Department shall provide for an annual review of all
of the requests for prior authorization submitted by providers of
health care during the immediately preceding year to determine
whether those providers meet the criteria prescribed by subsection
1 for an exemption from the requirement to obtain prior
authorization. If a provider of health care is initially determined to
be ineligible for an exemption based on such a review, the
eligibility of the provider of health care to receive an exemption
must be independently determined by a provider of health care
who:
(a) Is licensed in this State;
(b) Is of the same or similar specialty as the provider of health
care who is being evaluated for an exemption; and
(c) Has experience providing the good or service for which the
exemption has been initially denied.
3. A provider of health care who is not granted an exemption
from the requirement to obtain prior authorization for a particular
good or service may, for that specific good or service, request from
the Department any evidence that supported the decision of the
Department to not grant the exemption for that good or service. A
provider of health care may submit a request for supporting
evidence pursuant to this subsection not more than once during a
single 12-month period for each good or service for which the
provider of health care has not been granted an exemption.
4. An exemption from the requirement to obtain prior
authorization pursuant to this section applies to the provision of
any good or service covered by the exemption which is provided or
ordered by the provider of health care to whom the exception
applies.
5. The Department shall not deny a claim or reduce the
amount of payment paid under a claim for a good or service that is
subject to an exemption pursuant to this section unless:
-
*SB398*

– 62 –
(a) The provider of health care who submitted the claim
knowingly and materially misrepresented the goods or services
actually provided to a recipient, and the provider of health care
made the misrepresentation with the specific intent to obtain a
payment from the Department to which the provider of health care
is not legally or contractually entitled; or
(b) The service or good for which payment is sought was not
substantially performed or provided, as applicable.
Sec. 65. 1. Not more than once during a single 12-month
period, the Department may reevaluate the eligibility of a provider
of health care to receive an exemption from the requirement to
obtain prior authorization pursuant to section 64 of this act.
2. The Department may revoke an exemption from the
requirement to obtain prior authorization granted to a provider of
health care pursuant to subsection 1 only if the Department
determines that the provider of health care would not have met the
criteria prescribed in subsection 1 of section 64 of this act for the
good or service to which the exemption applies based on:
(a) A retrospective review of claims submitted by the provider
of health care for that good or service during the immediately
preceding 3 months; or
(b) If the provider of health care did not submit at least 10
claims for that good or service during the immediately preceding 3
months, a retrospective review of at least the last 10 claims
submitted by the provider of health care for that good or service.
3. If it is initially determined that a provider of health care
meets the criteria prescribed in subsection 2 for the revocation of
an exemption based on a review conducted pursuant to that
subsection, the satisfaction of those criteria must be independently
determined by a provider of health care described in subsection 2
of section 64 of this act before the Department may revoke the
exemption.
4. If the Department revokes an exemption from the
requirement to obtain prior authorization pursuant to subsection
2, the Department shall transmit to the provider of health care to
which the revocation pertains a notice that includes:
(a) The information that the Department relied upon when
making the determination described in subsection 2;
(b) An identification of each good or service to which the
revoked exemption applies;
(c) The date on which the revocation takes effect, which must
not be earlier than 30 days after the date on which the Department
transmits the notice; and
-
*SB398*

– 63 –
(d) A description, written in easily comprehensible language,
of how the provider of health care may appeal the revocation
pursuant to subsection 5.
5. The Department shall adopt a procedure by which a
provider of health care may appeal the revocation of an exemption
from the requirement to obtain prior authorization. If a provider
of health care appeals a revocation of such exemption, the
exemption must remain in effect:
(a) If the revocation is reversed on appeal, until the next
reevaluation pursuant to subsection 1 of the eligibility of the
provider of health care to continue receiving the exemption.
(b) If the revocation is upheld on appeal, until the later of the
5th calendar day after the revocation is upheld or the date
contained within the notice sent to the provider of health care
pursuant to subsection 4.
Sec. 66. 1. If the Department violates sections 56 to 63,
inclusive, of this act with respect to a particular request for prior
authorization, the request shall be deemed approved.
2. Any provision of a contract or agreement that conflicts
with this section or sections 56 to 65, inclusive, of this act is
against public policy, void and unenforceable.
Sec. 67. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, the
Department shall publish on an Internet website maintained by
the Department in an easily accessible format the following
information for the immediately preceding calendar year, in
aggregated form for all requests for prior authorization received
by the Department for medical or dental care provided to
recipients during the immediately preceding year and
disaggregated in accordance with subsection 2:
(a) The percentage of requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care that were approved upon initial review;
(b) The percentage of requests for prior authorization for
medical or dental care that resulted in an adverse determination
upon initial review;
(c) The percentage of the adverse determinations described in
paragraph (b) that were appealed;
(d) The percentage of appeals of adverse determinations
described in paragraph (c) that resulted in a reversal of the
adverse determination; and
(e) The average time between a request for prior authorization
for medical or dental care and the resolution of the request.
2. The information described in subsection 1 must be
disaggregated for the following categories:
(a) The specialty of the provider of health care who submitted
a request for prior authorization; and
-
*SB398*

– 64 –
(b) The types of medical or dental care at issue in the request
for prior authorization, including the specific types of prescription
drugs, procedures or diagnostic tests involved in the requests.
3. The Department shall not include individually identifiable
health information in the information published pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 68. 1. On or before March 1 of each calendar year, the
Department shall:
(a) Compile a report containing the following information for
Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance Program:
(1) The specific goods and services for which the
Department requires prior authorization and, for each good or
service:
(I) The number of requests for prior authorization
received by the Department during the immediately preceding
calendar year for the provision of the good or service to recipients;
(II) The average and median amount of time, in hours,
between the Department receiving a request for prior
authorization listed pursuant to sub-subparagraph (I), except
those requests for which the Department required additional
information to process the request, and the Department approving
or making an adverse determination on the request;
(III) The number and percentage of requests for prior
authorization listed pursuant to sub-subparagraph (I) that were
not included in calculating the times described in sub-
subparagraph (II);
(IV) The number and percentage of the requests listed
pursuant to sub-subparagraph (I) that were approved;
(V) The number and percentage of the requests listed
pursuant to sub-subparagraph (I) that resulted in adverse
determinations;
(VI) The number of appeals from adverse
determinations listed pursuant to sub-subparagraph (V) during
the immediately preceding calendar year and the number and
percentage of those adverse determinations that were reversed on
appeal by the Department;
(VII) The number of appeals described in sub-
subparagraph (VI) processed at each level of the appeals process
established by the Department, if applicable; and
(VIII) The number and percentage of requests listed
pursuant to sub-subparagraphs (IV) and (V) that were processed
by the Department with the assistance of artificial intelligence,
machine-learning technology or other similar technologies that
are independently capable of generating recommendations for or
decisions on requests for prior authorization;
-
*SB398*

– 65 –
(2) The information required pursuant to sub-
subparagraphs (I) to (VIII), inclusive, of subparagraph (1)
aggregated for all requests for prior authorization received by the
Department during the immediately preceding year;
(3) The number of complaints received by the Department
from recipients in the immediately preceding calendar year
relating to requests for prior authorization or the requirements
established by the Department for prior authorization;
(4) A description of the type and nature of any technology
described in sub-subparagraph (VIII) of subparagraph (1) used by
the Department, if applicable, to process requests for prior
authorization;
(5) A list of each surgical procedure for which the
Department required prior authorization during the immediately
preceding calendar year where, in the course of the surgical
procedure, the provider of health care performing the procedure
determined that an additional or substitute item or service was
medically necessary and, for each such surgical procedure, the
number of times during the immediately preceding calendar year
that:
(I) The surgical procedure was performed on a
recipient;
(II) The provider of health care performing the surgical
procedure determined that an additional or substitute item or
service was medically necessary;
(III) The Department agreed to cover the additional or
substitute item or service;
(IV) The Department made an adverse determination
concerning coverage for the additional or substitute item or
service;
(V) Such additional information as the Director may
wish to provide; and
(6) A list of specific goods and services for which the
Department approved requests for prior authorization at a
combined rate of 80 percent or more during the immediately
preceding year; and
(b) Post the report on the Internet website maintained by the
Department; and
(c) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services.
2. The Department shall not include individually identifiable
health information in a report published pursuant to this section.
-
*SB398*

– 66 –
Sec. 69. NRS 422.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.403 1. The Department shall, by regulation, establish and
manage the use by the Medicaid program of step therapy and prior
authorization for prescription drugs.
2. The Drug Use Review Board shall:
(a) Advise the Department concerning the use by the Medicaid
program of step therapy and prior authorization for prescription
drugs;
(b) Develop step therapy protocols and prior authorization
policies and procedures that comply with the provisions of sections
49 to 68, inclusive, of this act for use by the Medicaid program for
prescription drugs; and
(c) Review and approve, based on clinical evidence and best
clinical practice guidelines and without consideration of the cost of
the prescription drugs being considered, step therapy protocols used
by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
3. The step therapy protocol established pursuant to this section
must not apply to a drug approved by the Food and Drug
Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric condition of a
recipient of Medicaid, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in Medicaid is located 60 miles or more from
the residence of the recipient; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the recipient, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
4. The Department shall accept and respond to any request
for prior authorization for a prescription drug through a secure
electronic transmission using the National Council for
-
*SB398*

– 67 –
Prescription Drug Programs SCRIPT standard described in 42
C.F.R. § 423.160(b).
5. The procedures for prior authorization established
pursuant to this section must not apply to prescription drugs
ordered as a part of a course of medication-assisted treatment for
opioid use disorder, which may include, without limitation:
(a) Methadone;
(b) Buprenorphine, whether administered alone or in
combination with naloxone; and
(c) Extended-release injectable naltrexone.
6. The Department shall not require the Drug Use Review
Board to develop, review or approve prior authorization policies or
procedures necessary for the operation of the list of preferred
prescription drugs developed pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
[5.] 7. The Department shall accept recommendations from the
Drug Use Review Board as the basis for developing or revising step
therapy protocols and prior authorization policies and procedures
used by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
[6.] 8. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires a
recipient of Medicaid to use a prescription drug or sequence of
prescription drugs other than a drug that a practitioner recommends
for treatment of a psychiatric condition of the recipient before
Medicaid provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 70. NRS 608.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.1555 Any employer who provides benefits for health care
to his or her employees shall provide the same benefits and pay
providers of health care in the same manner as a policy of insurance
pursuant to chapters 689A and 689B of NRS, including, without
limitation, as required by paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of subsection
2 of NRS 687B.225, subsections 1, 3 and 5 to 8, inclusive, of NRS
687B.225, NRS 687B.409, 687B.723 and 687B.725 [.] and sections
2 to 24, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 71. 1. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
apply to a request for prior authorization submitted:
(a) Under a contract or policy of health insurance issued before
January 1, 2026, but apply to any request for prior authorization
submitted under any renewal of such a contract or policy.
(b) To the Department of Health and Human Services before
January 1, 2026, for medical or dental care provided to a recipient of
Medicaid.
-
*SB398*

– 68 –
2. A health carrier must, in order to continue requiring prior
authorization in contracts or policies of health insurance issued or
renewed on or after January 1, 2026:
(a) Develop a procedure for obtaining prior authorization that
complies with NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 25 of this act,
and sections 2 to 24, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Obtain the approval of the Commissioner of Insurance
pursuant to NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 25 of this act, for
the procedure developed pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. As used in this section, “health carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 6 of this act.
Sec. 72. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 73. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 74. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 73, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purposes of adopting any
regulations, performing any other preparatory administrative tasks
that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act and
approving procedures for obtaining prior authorization pursuant to
NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 25 of this act, and section 71
of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB398*